Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 30-501 to 30-518 shall be known and may be cited as the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (2015).

Laws 2016, LB829, § 1.